Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 5 Administration and Enforcement

Cross references.

Establishment and enforcement of sanitary regulations pertaining to restaurants, taverns and other establishments, §

26-2-370

et seq.

Similar provisions regarding administration and enforcement of mental health laws, T. 37, C. 1.

Administrative procedure generally, T. 50, C. 13.